Utah statutes.
11-42-506.   Release and discharge of assessment lien -- Notice of
dissolution of assessment area.
(1) (a)  Upon an assessment on a parcel of property having been paid in full,
the local entity shall file, in the office of the recorder of the county in
which the property is located, a release and discharge of the assessment lien
on that property.
(b)  Each release and discharge under Subsection (1)(a) shall:
(i)  include a legal description of the affected property; and
(ii)  comply with other applicable requirements for recording a document.
(2) (a)  Upon all assessments levied within an assessment area having been
paid in full, or upon payment in full having been provided for, the local
entity shall file, in the office of the recorder of the county in which the
property within the assessment area is located, a notice of the dissolution of
the assessment area.
(b)  Each notice under Subsection (2)(a) shall:
(i)  include a legal description of the property assessed within the
assessment area; and
(ii)  comply with all other applicable requirements for recording a document.
